Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 3. Sexual Assault
§ 6-2-308.
Criminality of conduct; victim's age.

Except as provided by subsection (b) of this section, if criminality of conduct in this article depends on a victim being under sixteen (16) years of age, it is an affirmative defense that the actor reasonably believed that the victim was sixteen (16) years of age or older.

If criminality of conduct in this article depends upon a victim being under twelve (12) years or under fourteen (14) years, it is no defense that the actor did not know the victim’s age, or that he reasonably believed that the victim was twelve (12) years or fourteen (14) years of age or older, as applicable.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1997, ch. 135, § 1; 1997, Sp. Sess., ch. 2, § 2.

Applicability.—

District court
did not abuse its discretion when it denied defendant's motion to
withdraw his guilty plea because counsel's performance was not deficient
for failure to advise defendant of the affirmative defense set forth
in the statute; because defendant pleaded guilty to third-degree sexual
abuse of a minor, in which criminality depended on a victim who is
less than 17)years of age, the affirmative defense did not apply. Berger v. State, 2017 WY 90, 399 P.3d 621,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 88

(Wyo. 2017).

Jury instruction on reasonable doubt proper. —

Trial court did not err by instructing the jury on the definition of reasonable doubt because in doing so it did not remove defendant’s subjective belief that the victim was 16 years of age or older from the jury’s consideration and the instruction followed the language of this section requiring defendant’s belief to be reasonable. 2021 WY 90,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 98

.

Improper jury instruction was harmless error. —

Prosecutor's misconduct in referring to defendant as a pedophile during rebuttal closing argument in a prosecution charging defendant with third-degree sexual assault, a violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-304

, was harmless error under Wyo. R. App. P. 9.04 because defendant had admitted to having sexual intercourse with the victim, and given the evidence at trial regarding whether he knew her age at the time, which was the only real issue at trial, it was doubtful that the prosecutor's use of the word “pedophile” affected the outcome of the case.
Phillips v. State, 2007 WY 25, 151 P.3d 1131,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 2007).

Quoted

in

Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Jun 12, 2013); Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Jun 12, 2013).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Mistake or lack of information as to victim's age as defense to statutory rape, 46 ALR5th 499.

§ 6-2-309.
Medical examination of victim; costs; use of report; minors; rights of victims; reimbursement.

A law enforcement agency receiving a report of a sexual assault may, with the victim’s consent, arrange for an examination of the victim by a licensed health care provider acting within the scope of the provider’s practice. The examination may include a medical examination and treatment, evidence collection and evaluation, and appropriate referrals for follow-up treatment and services. Upon consent of the victim to release of the results of the examination, the evidence, record and reports shall be delivered to the law enforcement agency.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 77, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 130, § 2.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 77, § 2.

If a report of a sexual assault is received from a minor victim, and the parents or guardian of the minor cannot be located promptly with diligent effort, the examination provided for by subsection (a) of this section may be conducted with the minor’s consent. If a report of a sexual assault is received alleging a minor as the victim and a parent or guardian is the suspected perpetrator, the parent or guardian who is the suspected perpetrator shall not be notified pursuant to this section.

Repealed by Laws 2006, ch. 77, § 2.

Except as provided by subsection (j) of this section, the costs of any examination relating to the investigation or prosecution of a sexual assault shall be billed to and paid by the victim services division of the office of the attorney general contingent upon available funding. The victim services division shall promulgate any rules necessary to effectuate payments required under this subsection. If victim services division funds are no longer available to meet the purposes of this subsection, the cost of any examination relating to the investigation or prosecution of sexual assault shall be billed to and paid by the investigating law enforcement agency. These examination costs shall include the following:

The cost of gathering evidence; and

Any other examinations authorized by law enforcement to aid in the investigation and prosecution of the sexual assault.

Except as provided by subsection (j) of this section, any examination costs directly incurred by a sexual assault victim that are not covered by subsection (g) of this section, or other collateral source, shall be submitted to the victim services division within the office of the attorney general for determination of eligibility for payment from the crime victims compensation account established by W.S.

1-40-114

. All requests for compensation from the account shall be subject to the eligibility guidelines set forth in the Crime Victims Compensation Act, W.S.

1-40-101

through

1-40-119

.

A convicted offender of a sexual assault shall be ordered to reimburse any costs incurred under subsections (g) and (h) of this section and any other costs incurred as a direct result of the sexual assault.

Each victim reporting a sexual assault shall be informed of the rights enumerated in this section, the victim’s rights to informed consent and the victim’s rights as a victim of crime. The victim shall also be informed of available medical, legal and advocacy services.

The examinations authorized by this section shall remain confidential healthcare information unless the victim or the victim’s parent or legal guardian executes a release of medical information for the purpose of prosecution to the county attorney, the state of Wyoming or any relevant court. However, if the report of sexual assault described in subsection (a) of this section results in the filing against any person of a criminal charge, or the filing of a petition alleging a delinquent act which would be a felony if committed by an adult, the written report disclosing the results of an examination made pursuant to this section shall be made available to the person charged or his counsel upon demand.

No evidence collected under subsection (a) of this section shall be destroyed until all applicable statutes of limitation have expired or a court orders the destruction.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1991, ch. 130, §§ 1, 2; 1994, ch. 61, § 2; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 2006, ch. 77, §§ 1, 2; 2019 ch. 76, § 2, effective July 1, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to reimbursement of costs incurred by crime victim for medical examination, see §

1-40-104

.

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

The 2006 amendment,

effective July 1, 2006, rewrote (a) to clarify the procedure for reporting a sexual assault; repealed former (b) pertaining to the rights of the patient being waived after medical examination; repealed former (d) pertaining to the medical examination report shall be available to the actor or counsel; in (e), substituted “a sexual assault” for “an alleged sexual assault,” inserted “victim,” inserted “or guardian,” substituted “the examination provided for” for “then medical examination required,” and added the last sentence; repealed former (f) pertaining to the time limitations on the delivery of the medical examination report, rewrote the introductory language of (g), to clarify the billing and reimbursement of examination costs, deleted “as outlined in the Wyoming sexual assault evidence kit” in (g)(i); deleted “medical” preceding “examination” in (h); inserted “the victim's rights to informed consent and the victim's rights as a victim of crime” in (k); added (m); and made stylistic changes.

The 2019 amendment,

effective July 1, 2019, in the introductory language of (g), added "victim services division of the office of the attorney general contingent upon available funding.
The victim services division shall promulgate any rules necessary to effectuate payments required under this subsection.
If victim services division funds are no longer available to meet the purposes of this subsection, the cost of any examination relating to the investigation or prosecution of sexual assault shall be billed to and paid by the" preceding "investigating law enforcement agency"; and added (n).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (i) or (

l

) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2004, ch. 95, § 308, appropriates $200,000 from the general fund to the attorney general for contracting for the provision of a legal assistance clinic in Laramie, Wyoming for victims of domestic violence or sexual assault for the period beginning July 1, 2004 and ending June 30, 2006. Should federal funding become available for this purpose, any unexpended general fund appropriations are to revert to the general fund upon receipt of federal funds.

Section does not serve as bar to accused pursuing exoneratingevidence. —

This section simply identifies the time limitations beyond which medical evidence from the usual rape victim becomes remote and thus so speculative that it no longer accomplishes the purpose for which it was designed. This doctrine is intended to protect the rape defendant from testimony which is elicited through unreliable medical evidence and it can hardly be said that it is calculated to serve as a bar to the citizen accused from pursuing exonerating evidence which, in turn, insures his receiving such a fair trial as is contemplated by the due process clauses of the federal and state constitutions. In re Matter of GP, 679 P.2d 976,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 269

(Wyo. 1984).

Failure of state to obtain medical report of sexual assault victim for trial

does not rise to the level of a due process violation. Sanchez v. State, 751 P.2d 1300,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1988), overruled in part, Bean v. State, 2016 WY 48, 373 P.3d 372,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 52

(Wyo. 2016); Vernier v. State, 909 P.2d 1344,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1996).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Constitutionality, with respect to accused's rights to information or confrontation, of statute according confidentiality to sex crime victim's communications to sexual counselor, 43 ALR4th 395.

Necessity or permissibility of mental examination to determine competency or credibility of complainant in sexual offense prosecution, 45 ALR4th 310.

Sufficiency of allegations or evidence of victim's mental injury or emotional distress to support charge of aggravated degree of rape, sodomy, or other sexual offense, 44 ALR5th 651.

§ 6-2-310.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 2009, ch. 18, § 2.

Editor's notes. —

This section, which derived from Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3, related to restrictions on disclosure or publication of information regarding a sexual assault.

Laws 2009, ch. 18, § 3, makes the act effective July 1, 2009.

§ 6-2-311.
Corroboration unnecessary.

Corroboration of a victim’s testimony is not necessary to obtain a conviction for sexual assault.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Jury should view with caution uncorroborated testimony of young child

who is prosecutrix in sexual assault case. Strand v. State, 36 Wyo. 78, 252 P. 1030,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1927).

Credibility deemed jury question. —

The credibility and weight of the testimony of the prosecutrix in a rape case is for the determination of the jury. Brown v. State, 581 P.2d 189,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1978).

Corroboration of child sexual assault victims'
testimony was not necessary to convict defendant of sexual assault; it was the jurors'
task to weigh the evidence and determine whether they found the victims or defendant more credible.
Tilley v. State, 2011 WY 153, 267 P.3d 552,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Wyo. 2011).

Complaint considered as to credibility of prosecutrix. —

While an immediate complaint does not corroborate the facts of a rape, that evidence may be considered in connection with the consistency and credibility of the prosecutrix. Brown v. State, 581 P.2d 189,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1978).

Quoted

in

Young v. State, 678 P.2d 880,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 272

(Wyo. 1984).

Stated

in

Tway v. State, 7 Wyo. 74, 50 P. 188,

1897 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1897); Strand v. State, 36 Wyo. 78, 252 P. 1030,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(1927); Brown v. State, 581 P.2d 189,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 205

(Wyo. 1978).

Cited

in

Muniz v. State, 783 P.2d 141,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 231

(Wyo. 1989).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Instruction in prosecution for rape or other sexual offense, as to ease of making or difficulty of defending against such a charge, 92 ALR3d 866.

Modern status of rule regarding necessity for corroboration of victim's testimony in prosecution for sexual offense, 31 ALR4th 120.

Instructions to jury as to credibility of child's testimony in criminal case, 32 ALR4th 1196.

Witnesses: child competency statute, 60 ALR4th 369.

Sufficiency of allegations or evidence of victim's mental injury or emotional distress to support charge of aggravated degree of rape, sodomy, or other sexual offense, 44 ALR5th 651.

§ 6-2-312.
Evidence of victim's prior sexual conduct or reputation; procedure for introduction.

In any prosecution under this article or for any lesser included offense, if evidence of the prior sexual conduct of the victim, reputation evidence or opinion evidence as to the character of the victim is to be offered the following procedure shall be used:

A written motion shall be made by the defendant to the court at least ten (10) days prior to the trial stating that the defense has an offer of proof of the relevancy of evidence of the sexual conduct of the victim and its relevancy to the defense;

The written motion shall be accompanied by affidavits in which the offer of proof is stated;

If the court finds the offer of proof sufficient, the court shall order a hearing in chambers, and at the hearing allow the questioning of the victim regarding the offer of proof made by the defendant and other pertinent evidence;

At the conclusion of the hearing, if the court finds that the probative value of the evidence substantially outweighs the probability that its admission will create prejudice, the evidence shall be admissible pursuant to this section. The court may make an order stating what evidence may be introduced by the defendant, which order may include the nature of the questions to be permitted.

This section does not limit the introduction of evidence as to prior sexual conduct of the victim with the actor.

Any motion or affidavit submitted pursuant to this section is privileged information and shall not be released or made available for public use or scrutiny in any manner, including posttrial proceedings.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, § 2.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a), substituted “6-2-304” for “6-2-305.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, substituted “this article” for “W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

” in the introductory language in (a).

Editor's notes. —

For the definition of “this article” as used in this section, see § 6-2-301(a)(ix).

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

Purpose of section. —

Rape-shield statutes, such as this section, are designed to protect the victim from embarrassment and abuse at trial and to encourage the reporting of sexual assaults to the authorities; they are not enacted for the protection of the accused. Heinrich v. State, 638 P.2d 641,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1981).

Procedures mandatory. —

By using the word “shall” in the introductory paragraph in subsection (a), the legislature has indicated a mandatory intent that cannot be ignored. Heinrich v. State, 638 P.2d 641,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1981).

But noncompliance harmless, absent prejudice. —

Failure to comply with the requirements of this section is harmless error, absent a showing of prejudice to the defendant. Heinrich v. State, 638 P.2d 641,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 405

(Wyo. 1981).

Probative value of victim's character deemed questionable. —

This section indicates the questionable probative value in offering the victim's character into evidence. Weddle v. State, 621 P.2d 231,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 327

(Wyo. 1980).

Evidence found inadmissible.—

District court did not abuse its discretion in applying the rape shield statute to restrict defendant’s cross-examination of one of the alleged student victim’s on the victim’s prior history as a sexual assault victim when defendant, a middle school teacher, was accused of multiple counts of sexual assault of a minor. Moser v. State, 2018 WY 12, 409 P.3d 1236,

2018 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 2018).

Evidence properly prohibited. —

In defendant's sexual assault case, a court properly prohibited evidence of the victim's prior sexual history where the record showed that defendant never attempted to comply with the requirements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-2-312

prior to seeking admission of the evidence. Watters v. State, 2004 WY 155, 101 P.3d 908,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 202

(Wyo. 2004).

Evidence found inadmissible. —

Evidence of murder defendant's sexual activity with boyfriend after killing of husband was not prohibited by this section, because first-degree murder was not one of the crimes enumerated in subsection (a), and defendant was the perpetrator, rather than the victim, of offense at issue. Trusky v. State, 7 P.3d 5,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 2000).

In a case involving two counts of first-degree sexual abuse of a minor and one count of second-degree sexual abuse of a minor, evidence of a victim's alleged “sexualized behavior” and “sexual sophistication” was inadmissible because it was covered by the rape shield statute. Carroll v. State, 2015 WY 87, 352 P.3d 251,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 98

(Wyo. 2015).

Previous false sexual-assault report properly excluded.

It was not an abuse of discretion to exclude a victim’s alleged prior false accusation of sexual assault because (1) the limited probative value of the evidence was outweighed by a risk of unfair prejudice, and, (2) due to the victim’s inability to recall the prior accusation, extensive, potentially inadmissible, evidence would have been required to admit the prior accusation.
Sparks v. State, 2019 WY 50, 440 P.3d 1095,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 5

0

(Wyo. 2019);
Booth v. Booth, 2019 WY 5, 432 P.3d 902,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 5

(Wyo. 2019).

A sexual-assault defendant's proffered evidence that the victim had falsely reported a previous sexual assault was properly excluded, where the evidence would have only served to attack the credibility of the victim. Johnson v. State, 806 P.2d 1282,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1991), reh'g denied,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Wyo. Mar. 27, 1991).

Evidence of prostitution several years before sexual assault properly excluded. —

See Stogner v. State, 674 P.2d 1298,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 247

(Wyo. 1984).

Counsel not ineffective where sexual-conduct evidence inadmissible. —

Where prior-sexual-conduct evidence was held inadmissible due to remoteness as well as untimeliness, and the defendant's counsel stated an experienced investigator had been used to inquire into the victim's background but was unable to uncover any evidence of prostitution, evidence that the defendant claimed existed, the defendant failed to demonstrate facts which occurred at his trial that supported his claim of ineffective assistance of counsel, or that counsel improperly failed to raise errors made at trial. Stogner v. State, 792 P.2d 1358,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 58

(Wyo. 1990).

Defendant
failed to show that defendant's trial attorney was constitutionally
ineffective in regard to a rape shield evidence motion or the use
of DNA evidence when counsel sought to argue that proffered evidence
was relevant to the victim's credibility. Additionally, counsel was
not entitled instead to have argued that evidence was relevant to
the issue of consent. McGarvey v. State, 2014 WY 66, 325 P.3d 450,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(Wyo. 2014).

Applied

in

Velos v. State, 752 P.2d 411,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 1988); Dean v. State, 931 P.2d 942,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1997).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Modern status of admissibility, in statutory rape prosecution, of complainant's prior sexual acts or general reputation for unchastity, 90 ALR3d 1300.

Modern status of admissibility, in forcible rape prosecution, of complainant's prior sexual acts, 94 ALR3d 257.

Modern status of admissibility in forcible rape prosecution of complainant's general reputation for unchastity, 95 ALR3d 1181.

Constitutionality of “rape shield” statute restricting use of evidence of victim's sexual experiences, 1 ALR4th 283.

Admissibility, in rape case, of evidence that accused raped or attempted to rape person other than prosecutrix, 2 ALR4th 330.

Impeachment or cross-examination of prosecuting witness in sexual offense trial by showing that prosecuting witness threatened to make similar charges against other persons, 71 ALR4th 448.

Impeachment or cross-examination of prosecuting witness in sexual offense trial by showing that similar charges were made against other persons, 71 ALR4th 469.

Admissibility of evidence that juvenile prosecuting witness in sex offense case had prior sexual experience for purposes of showing alternative source of child's ability to describe sex acts, 83 ALR4th 685.

Sufficiency of allegations or evidence of victim's mental injury or emotional distress to support charge of aggravated degree of rape, sodomy, or other sexual offense, 44 ALR5th 651.

Discoverability and admissibility of plaintiff's past sexual behavior in title VII sexual harassment action, 73 ALR Fed 748.

Admissibility in sex offense case, under Rule 412 of Federal Rules of Evidence, of evidence of victim's past sexual behavior, 166 ALR Fed 639.

§ 6-2-313.
Sexual battery.

Except under circumstances constituting a violation of W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

,

6-2-314

through

6-2-317

or

6-2-502

, an actor who unlawfully subjects another person to any sexual contact is guilty of sexual battery.

Sexual battery is a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both.

History.

Laws 2001, ch. 41, § 1; 2007, ch. 159, § 2.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), inserted “6-2-314 through

6-2-317

or,” and deleted “or

14-3-105

” preceding “an actor who unlawfully.”

Error to exclude witness testimony. —

In a juvenile proceeding, the trial court erred in excluding two of defendant's proposed witnesses from testifying for violating its oral exclusionary order where there was no evidence presented nor was it claimed that one witness spoke to the other witness with the knowledge or consent of defendant or his counsel and reasonable confusion remained on the part of defendant and his counsel regarding the extent of the oral order entered by the court. KC v. State, 2004 WY 74, 92 P.3d 805,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 94

(Wyo. 2004).

Lesser-included offense instruction not required. —

Although an appellate court did not decide whether sexual battery was a lesser-included offense of first-degree sexual assault and third-degree sexual assault, a trial court did not err by refusing to give a lesser-included offense instruction because the defendant admitted that sexual contact had occurred and the theory of the defense, consent, only allowed a jury to find defendant guilty or not guilty of the greater offense. Dean v. State, 2003 WY 128, 77 P.3d 692,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 2003).

In a case involving second-degree sexual assault, a trial court did not err by denying a request for lesser-included jury instructions for third-degree sexual assault or sexual battery under the circumstances of the case due to the fact that different elements were required.
Heywood v. State, 2007 WY 149, 170 P.3d 1227,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2007).

When defendant was convicted of ten counts of third degree sexual assault based on inappropriate sexual contact with his chiropractic patients, the district court did not err in failing to sua sponte consider his conduct as a lesser included offense of sexual battery.
Faubion v. State, 2010 WY 79, 233 P.3d 926,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 2010).

Cited in

Reifer v. State, 2014 WY 139,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Nov. 5, 2014).

§ 6-2-314.
Sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree; penalties.

An actor commits the crime of sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree if:

Being sixteen (16) years of age or older, the actor inflicts sexual intrusion on a victim who is less than thirteen (13) years of age;

Being eighteen (18) years of age or older, the actor inflicts sexual intrusion on a victim who is less than eighteen (18) years of age, and the actor is the victim’s legal guardian or an individual specified in W.S.

6-4-402

;

Being eighteen (18) years of age or older, the actor inflicts sexual intrusion on a victim who is less than sixteen (16) years of age and the actor occupies a position of authority in relation to the victim.

Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section, a person convicted under subsection (a) of this section is subject to imprisonment for not more than fifty (50) years, unless the person convicted qualifies under W.S. 6-2-306(e).

A person convicted under paragraph (a)(i) of this section, where the actor is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, is subject to imprisonment for not less than twenty-five (25) years nor more than fifty (50) years, unless the person convicted qualified under W.S. 6-2-306(e).

History.

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 1; 2010, ch. 110, § 1.

The 2010 amendment,

effective July 1, 2010, in (b), added “Except as provided in subsection (c) of this section”; and added (c).

Effective date. —

Laws 2007, ch. 159, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2007.

Evidence Sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain defendant's conviction for sexual abuse of a minor in the first degree because the sexual assault nurse examiner's testimony explained that the victim said, “Daddy puts his peepee in my butt hole, and it itches, and it scratches, and it hurts.” The nurse also testified that, during her examination, the victim's anus dilated instantly and she found a healing area on the anus. Mersereau v. State, 2012 WY 125, 286 P.3d 97,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2012).

Evidence sufficient.—

Evidence was sufficient to prove sexual intrusion on the alleged seven-year-old victim by sexual intercourse because (1) the victim testified that defendant put defendant’s privates to the victim’s private parts; (2) the SANE nurse testified that the victim told the nurse that defendant laid the victim down, spread the victim’s legs apart, and that defendant’s private parts touched the victim’s private parts in and out; and (3) the victim’s parent testified that defendant was then 29 years old. Jackson v. State, 2019 WY 81, 445 P.3d 983,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 83

(Wyo. 2019).

Crimes not required to be merged for sentencing.—

Kidnapping and first-degree sexual abuse of a minor each require an element the other does not, as the former requires sexual intrusion, whereas the latter does not, and that the kidnapping charge referred to the sexual abuse charge was of no moment, as the jury was not required to find every element of sexual abuse to convict defendant of kidnapping, and the jury had to find only that defendant removed the child victim with the intent to commit sexual abuse. Double jeopardy did not require the sentences to be merged. Winters v. State, 2019 WY 76, 446 P.3d 191,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 77

(Wyo. 2019).

Incest is lesser-included offense of first-degree sexual abuse. —

Defendant's conviction for incest, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-4-402(a)(iii), was a lesser-included offense of the crime of first-degree sexual abuse of a minor, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-2-314(a)(ii), and constituted the “same offense” under a double jeopardy analysis. Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2013).

No breach of plea agreement. —

State did not breach the plea agreement by stating defendant pleaded guilty to three felony counts of sexual abuse of a minor when in fact he pleaded no contest; the statements were harmless, because there was no sentencing agreement and the district court was not misled by the statements. The district court sentenced defendant to consecutive terms of 20 to 35 years in prison on each of the two second degree offenses under this section.
Mercer v. State, 2012 WY 54, 273 P.3d 1100,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo. 2012).

Rejection of sentencing recommendation. —

Trial court did not commit plain error by rejecting defendant's sentencing recommendation and instead imposing a sentence of 22 to 24 years in prison after he entered an Alford plea to three counts of first degree sexual abuse of a minor and one count of third degree sexual abuse of a minor because defendant failed to establish that the trial court found a lack of remorse based solely on his silence; even though he entered an Alford plea and remained silent as to the factual basis for his guilty plea, he did not maintain that silence during his sentencing and his statement to the trial court included an apology of sorts. The trial court also identified a number of factors that it relied on in reaching its sentencing decision, including the victim impact statement and the chronic sexual abuse defendant perpetrated on his daughter. Joreski v. State, 2012 WY 143, 288 P.3d 413,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 2012).

Jury instructions. —

On plain error
review, defendant showed jury instruction errors alleged were clearly
set forth in the record and transgressed a clear and unequivocal
rule
of law by including fondling or touching the victim's vagina
in the
definition of sexual intrusion, contrary to the statute,
but
defendant
was entitled to no relief because the instruction
also
required finding
sexual intrusion by inserting a finger in
the victim's
vagina, so
the State had to prove more than the statute
required,
giving defendant
more protection, to prove sexual abuse
of a minor
in the first degree. Nunamaker v. State, 2017 WY 100, 401 P.3d 863,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 105

(Wyo. 2017).

Cited in

Deeds v. State, 2014 WY 124,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 141

(Oct. 3, 2014); Hodge v. State, 2015 WY 103,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 118

(Aug. 12, 2015); McGill v. State, 2015 WY 132,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Sept. 28, 2015); Hamilton v. State, 2017 WY 72, 396 P.3d 1009,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 72

(Wyo. 2017).

Haynes v. State, 2012 WY 151;

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 158

(Nov 29, 2012).

Other acts evidence admissible. —

In a case in which defendant was convicted of two counts of sexual intrusion on the victim, the district court did not abuse its discretion when it allowed testimony alleging earlier acts of sexual abuse of defendant’s nieces when they were children because the evidence was probative and relevant to motive, and the trial court gave a limiting instruction to the jury prior to the nieces’ testimony. LaJeunesse v. State, 2020 WY 29, 458 P.3d 1213,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2020).

Prior consistent statements admissible. —

In a case in which defendant was convicted of two counts of sexual intrusion on the victim, although the defense did not directly maintain the victim was fabricating her accusations or had been improperly influenced, because the jury was invited to consider that possibility, the district court did not abuse its discretion in allowing the victim’s prior consistent statements identifying her father as the perpetrator. LaJeunesse v. State, 2020 WY 29, 458 P.3d 1213,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 2020).

Applied

in

Duke v. State, 2009 WY 74, 209 P.3d 563,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(June 3, 2009); Crain v. State, 2009 WY 128, 218 P.3d 934,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 140

(Oct. 22, 2009); Craft v. State, 2013 WY 41,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 45

(Apr 9, 2013).

Quoted

in

Wimbley v. State, 2009 WY 72, 208 P.3d 608,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 71

(June 2, 2009); Norgaard v. State, 2014 WY 157,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Dec. 9, 2014); Hathaway v. State, 2017 WY 92, 399 P.3d 625,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 91

(Wyo. 2017); Carrier v. State, 2017 WY 88, 400 P.3d 358,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 96

(Wyo. 2017).